Delaware, session 153, HB292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 80 of Title 15 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 8034. Review of reports by Department. (a) Within 60 days of filing, the Department shall review all reports of contributions and expenditures listed in Â§ 8030 of this title to confirm that there are no violations of this title. (1) After the report required under Â§ 8030 is filed with the Department it must be published on the Departmentâs website and clearly marked as âSubmitted but Not Reviewedâ. (2) If the Department finds no violations in the report, the report must be clearly marked as âReviewed and Finalâ. (3) If any violations are discovered, the Department must work with the candidate to rectify the violations under the Departmentâs rules and regulations. Once the violations are corrected and the candidate submits an amended report that does not include any violations, the reportâs status shall be updated on the Departmentâs website and clearly marked as âReviewed and Finalâ. (b) This section applies to all reports and contributions listed in Â§ 8030 of this title submitted after March 1, 2026.